Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4724
Fees.

Every prepaid limited health service organization subject to the Prepaid Limited Health Service Organization Act shall pay to the director the following fees:

(1) For filing an application for certificate of authority or amendment thereto, one hundred dollars;

(2) For filing a change in rates, charges, or benefits, material modification of any matter or document, or addition of a limited health service, fifty dollars;

(3) For filing each annual report, fifty dollars; and

(4) For filing periodic reports as required by the director, fifty dollars.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 24.